Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 9

Safe Deposit and Safekeeping

45-2-901. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agent” means any person duly authorized in writing by a lessee to enter a safe deposit box rented by the lessee, whether the person be denominated as “agent,” “deputy,” “attorney-in-fact,” or otherwise. The agent's authority shall be established and shall continue until revoked, both in accordance with § 45-2-707;

“Fiduciary” means trustee, agent, executor, administrator, committee, guardian or conservator for a minor or other incompetent person, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for creditors or any holders of a similar position of trust;

“Lessee” means a person contracting with a lessor for the use of a safe deposit box;

“Lessor” means a bank or subsidiary corporation of a bank renting safe deposit facilities, and includes a safe deposit company organized and operating under the jurisdiction of the department solely for the purpose of leasing safe deposit facilities; and

“Safe deposit box” means a safe deposit box, vault, or other safe deposit receptacle maintained by a lessor and the rules relating thereto apply to property or documents kept in safekeeping in the bank's vault.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.220); T.C.A., § 45-415; Acts 1984, ch. 624, § 1; 1988, ch. 926, § 5.

Cross-References. Applicability of part to savings and loan associations and savings banks, §45-2-106.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-2-902. Authority to engage in leasing safe deposit facilities — Liability of lessor.

Any bank has the right to construct a vault on its real estate, or on premises leased by it, or to rent any vault that, in the judgment of the directors, will provide reasonable means of safety against loss by theft, fire or other cause, in which vault may be placed safes, boxes, or receptacles, for the keeping of jewelry, diamonds, gold, bank notes, bonds, notes, and other valuables, and that may be rented by the bank to other persons on the terms agreed to by the parties, but it is understood that in no event shall the bank be liable for any loss of the jewelry, diamonds, gold, bank notes, bonds, notes, or other valuables by theft, robbery, fire, or other cause, the bank not being the insurer of the safety of the property, nor in any manner liable for the safety of the property. The bank is not required to take any note of property thus deposited, as the person who rents a safe, box, or receptacle is, for the term of the lease, the owner thereof.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.221); T.C.A., § 45-416.

45-2-903. Access by fiduciaries.

Where a safe deposit box is made available by a lessor to one (1) or more fiduciaries, the lessor may, except as otherwise expressly provided in the lease or the writings pursuant to which the fiduciaries are acting, allow access thereto to any one (1) or more of the fiduciaries or to any agent authorized in writing by any one (1) or more of the fiduciaries.

The lessee, the lessee's estate or any successor fiduciary is bound by any dealings between the agent and the lessor pursuant to a power granting the agent access to a safe deposit box until the lessor has written notice of revocation of that power.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.222); T.C.A., § 45-417.

45-2-904. Lease to minor.

A bank may lease a safe deposit box to and in connection therewith deal with a minor with the same effect as if leasing to and dealing with a person of full legal capacity.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.223); T.C.A., § 45-418.

45-2-905. Death of persons having access.

No lessor shall rent any safe deposit box without first requiring all persons entitled to access to the safe deposit box to agree in writing to notify the lessor of the death of a sole or last surviving lessee of the safe deposit box, and all persons having the right of access to the safe deposit box, upon the death of the other person having the right of access to the safe deposit box, before seeking access, shall notify the lessor of the death of the lessee, and the lessor may rely conclusively upon the absence of notification in allowing a person with a right of access to enter the box.

Access to a safe deposit box shall be in accordance with the agreement between a lessor and lessee or lessees. The death of a person authorized access to a safe deposit box by the agreement shall not terminate the access of others so authorized in all cases where there is a surviving lessee, whether the surviving lessee is an individual, trust, corporation or other entity, unless further access is restricted by the agreement or by court order.

Upon the death of the sole or last surviving lessee of a safe deposit box, access is authorized as follows:

The duly qualified executor or administrator of the lessee may have access to and remove contents from the safe deposit box, without inventory unless an inventory is required by the lessor or by court order;

In order to search for and remove any written instrument purporting to be the lessee's last will and testament, or any writing relating to a burial plot or burial instructions, or any writing purporting to be an insurance policy on the life of the lessee, a lessor shall permit a person named in a court order for that purpose, or if no order has been served upon the lessor, the lessee's spouse, parent, adult sibling or adult descendant, or a person named as executor in a copy of the lessee's purported will provided to the lessor, or any person with a right of access to the safe deposit box immediately prior to the death of the lessee, to open the safe deposit box with an officer or employee of the lessor and remove the documents. A record of items removed from the box by the person authorized entry shall be made by the lessor and the other person. If a purported will is found that does not name as executor the person conducting the will search with the lessor's representative, the lessor may make a copy thereof and mail or deliver it to the executor named therein, or to the court having jurisdiction of the decedent's estate according to the decedent's domicile as declared in the instrument; and

If an executor or administrator of the lessee's estate has not requested access to the contents within sixty (60) days following the lessee's death, the lessor may then permit access by the surviving spouse or any next-of-kin of the lessee for the purposes of inventory and the removal of contents. Prior to removal, an officer or employee of the lessor and the surviving spouse or next-of-kin of the lessee shall inventory the contents of the box and prepare a record thereof to be retained by the lessor.

Upon the death of the sole or last surviving lessee, the lessor shall notify the department of revenue of the death of the lessee and the existence of a safe deposit box within thirty (30) days of the time the lessor has actual knowledge of the lessee's death. The lessor shall retain records made pursuant to subsection (c) for a period of three (3) years after entry. Chapter 10 of this title notwithstanding, the lessor shall provide copies of the record to the department upon its request, to the executor or administrator of the decedent upon request, and to any party designated by court order, and the lessor may elect to provide copies to any person authorized access to the box at the time of the decedent's death, or to any person having a degree of kinship to the decedent equal to that of the next-of-kin who received contents following the death of the decedent.

A lessor shall not be liable to any person for the removal or loss of any contents from a safe deposit box during a period of access by an executor or administrator of a deceased lessee, or by any other person or persons authorized access to open and examine contents, whether the property removed or lost is that of the decedent's estate, a surviving lessee, or any other person, and the lessor is entitled to its expenses in defending against such a claim of liability.

To the extent that there is a conflict between this section and § 67-8-417 or § 67-8-418, this section shall control.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.224); 1974, ch. 597, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 45-419; Acts 1984, ch. 624, § 2; 1993, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 1085, § 1.

Cross-References. Access to box after death, §67-8-418.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 316, 964.

45-2-906. Adverse claims to contents of safe deposit box.

An adverse claim to the contents of a safe deposit box, or to property held in safekeeping, is not sufficient to require the lessor to deny access to its lessee unless:

The lessor is directed to do so by order of a court of competent jurisdiction; or

The safe deposit box is leased or the property is held in the name of the lessee with the addition of words indicating that the contents or property are held in a fiduciary capacity, and the adverse claim is supported by a written statement of facts disclosing that it is made by or on behalf of a beneficiary and that there is reason to know that the fiduciary will misappropriate the trust property.

A claim is also an adverse claim where one (1) of several lessees claims, contrary to the terms of the lease, an exclusive right of access, or where one (1) or more persons claim a right of access as agents or officers of a lessee to the exclusion of others as agents or officers, or where it is claimed that a lessee is the same person as one using another name.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.225); T.C.A., § 45-420.

45-2-907. Special remedies for nonpayment of rent.

Notice. If the rental due on a safe deposit box has not been paid, the lessor shall, not sooner than thirty (30) days nor later than four (4) years after the rental was due, send a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by registered mail to the last known address of the lessee, stating that unless payment of the rental is made within thirty (30) days after the date of the notice:

The safe deposit box will be opened and its contents stored for a minimum of one (1) year at the expense of the lessee;

Without additional notice to the lessee, the contents may be offered for sale and unsold or unsalable items will be destroyed; and

The proceeds of the sale, less expenses, unpaid rental charges, and storage will be transferred to the state treasurer pursuant to title 66, chapter 29, part 1.

Inventory and Report to State Treasurer. If the rental is not paid within thirty (30) days from the mailing of the notice, the box shall be opened in the presence of an officer or employee of the lessor and a notary public who also may be, but is not required to be, an officer or employee of the lessor. Those persons shall take an inventory of the contents of the safe deposit box. The contents, together with the inventory, shall be sealed in a package by the notary public who shall write on the outside the name of the lessee and the date of the opening. The lessor shall report the name and last known address of the lessee and the contents of the box, as attested by the notary public, to the state treasurer pursuant to title 66, chapter 29, part 1. The report shall be delivered to the state treasurer in a format as prescribed by the state treasurer and shall be due on May 1 of the year following the calendar year in which the box is opened. The package shall then be retained by the lessor at a rental not exceeding the rental charges for the box.

Disposition of Property. Prior to an auction or sale, the following types of property may be rejected as unsalable by an independent appraiser, an auctioneer, or the lessor and disposed of in the following manners:

Documents or writings of a private nature having little or no apparent value may be destroyed by the lessor;

Coins or currency with a face value of twenty dollars ($20.00) or less each that are valued at no more than twice the face value, shall be treated as proceeds from a sale and deposited as provided in subsection (e);

Coins or currency with a face value of greater than twenty dollars ($20.00) each that are valued at one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) or less of face value, shall be treated as proceeds from a sale and deposited as provided in subsection (e);

Any tangible item having an estimated sale value of less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) may be destroyed by the lessor; provided, that the aggregate value of the items for a specific lessee does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250); and

Any tangible property including, but not limited to, stocks, bonds and promissory notes, shall be delivered to the state treasurer pursuant to title 66, chapter 29, part 1.

A current version of any recognized numismatist publication may be utilized for purposes of valuation of coins and currency.

Sale of Property. If the contents of the safe deposit box have not been claimed and redeemed by the payment of charges within one (1) year after filing the report with the state treasurer, but not before May 1 of the succeeding year, the lessor shall sell the contents of the box at public auction or by other commercially reasonable sale at whatever time and place affords, in the judgment of the lessor, the most favorable price for the property involved. For purposes of this section, “commercially reasonable” includes, but is not limited to, a sale that would be commercially reasonable under § 47-9-610, or a sale, or sale methodology, that is approved by the commissioner of financial institutions. A lessor may sell the contents of safe deposit boxes in a sale conducted exclusively for the lessor, or in a sale conducted jointly for the lessor and any number of other financial institutions or other entities. The time, place and manner of any public sale shall be posted conspicuously on the premise, of the lessor and advertised once in a newspaper of general circulation in the community, or in some other commercially reasonable manner of advertising. Property sold through other than a public auction shall be appraised, in writing, by a person who does not acquire the appraised contents and who is regularly engaged in the business of appraising, buying or selling like merchandise, or any other combination thereof. Firearms shall be sold through a federal firearm licensed dealer, or if sold at public auction, through an auctioneer who possesses a federal firearm license.

Disposition of sale proceeds. The monetary proceeds resulting from any sale conducted pursuant to this section, after deducting accumulated charges, including a proportionate share of the expense of advertising and conducting the sale, shall be deposited to the credit of the lessee in any existing account maintained by the lessor on behalf of the lessee; provided, that the deposit shall not constitute account activity under title 66, chapter 29, part 1. If no account exists, proceeds shall be delivered to the state treasurer pursuant to title 66, chapter 29, part 1.

Immunity for Destruction of Property. Property offered for sale at a public auction or other commercially reasonable sale for which no purchaser exists shall be destroyed by the lessor and no action or proceeding may be maintained against the lessor, the independent appraiser or auctioneer, the state treasurer or any of their employees for or on account of the action. If, prior to the sale, the property is rejected by an independent appraiser or auctioneer in accordance with subsection (c), the property shall be destroyed by the lessor and no action or proceeding may be maintained against the lessor, the independent appraiser or auctioneer, the state treasurer or any of their employees for or on account of the action.

Final Report. After disposition of all contents of a safe deposit box, the lessor shall provide to the state treasurer an updated inventory on the contents of the box, together with property not sold pursuant to subdivision (c)(5). The report shall include information that the state treasurer may, by rule and regulation, direct.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.226); T.C.A., § 45-421; Acts 1983, ch. 78, §§ 6-8; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1994, ch. 773, § 1; 1999, ch. 194, § 1; 2008, ch. 677, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 194, § 1 provided that for the purpose of transitioning from the law in effect prior to May 19, 1999, to the process specified in this section, the following provisions shall apply:

The contents of all safe deposit boxes opened pursuant of this section, on and after May 19, 1999, shall be subject to the provisions of this section as amended by Acts 1999, ch. 194, § 1; and

The contents of all safe deposit boxes opened pursuant of this section, prior to May 19, 1999, shall be subject to the notice provisions of prior law; provided, that the financial institution may elect to apply the provisions of subsections (c)-(g) of this section as amended by Acts 1999, ch. 194, § 1, to the sale and disposal of such property.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

A state trust company;

A state bank authorized to act as a fiduciary;

A savings association or savings bank organized under the laws of this state and authorized to act as a fiduciary;

A national bank having its principal office in this state and authorized by the comptroller of the currency to act as a fiduciary pursuant to 12 U.S.C. § 92a;

A federally chartered savings association or savings bank having its principal office in this state and authorized by its federal chartering authority to act as a fiduciary;

An out-of-state bank with a branch in this state established or maintained pursuant to this chapter, or a trust office authorized by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter;

An out-of-state trust company with a trust office authorized by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter;

A foreign bank with a trust office authorized by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter; or

A private trust company to the extent authorized by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

A bank authorized to act as a fiduciary, which includes a trust company for the purposes of this section and §§ 45-2-1002 — 45-2-1006, having and maintaining paid-in capital and surplus of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), may be appointed a fiduciary or cofiduciary by any person or any court having jurisdiction and authority to appoint fiduciaries.

When appointed as a fiduciary for a minor or other incompetent person, a bank shall have only the custody, control, management and administration of the property or estate of the person.

The personal care and custody of any minor or other incompetent person shall be committed and confided to those individuals who would otherwise be entitled by law to the guardianship or care and custody of the person of the minor or incompetent person.